Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-718
Elective constitutional state officer; status; effect of bond or insurance policy; right of action to establish; consent of state to suit.

Whenever an issue arises involving the status or other legal relations of an elective constitutional state officer, or the validity, terms, or duration of his or her official bond or equivalent commercial insurance policy, and the issue is within the original jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of Nebraska, such officer is authorized to institute an action in his or her own name in such court for the purpose of determining such issues, and to make the State of Nebraska and any other person, firm, or corporation parties defendant therein. The State of Nebraska consents to be sued in any such action.

Laws 1935, c. 187, §§ 1, 2, p. 693;

C.S.Supp.,1941, §§ 84-727, 84-728;

R.S.1943, § 84-718;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 52.